Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-15,265
Swimming pools; construction; sanitary and safety requirements; department; local government; duties.

(1) The department shall adopt and have available minimum sanitary and safety requirements in the form of regulations for the design, construction, equipment, and operation of swimming pools and bather preparation facilities. Such regulations shall include, but not be limited to, provisions for waiver or variance of design standards and the circumstances under which such waiver or variance may be granted. No swimming pool shall be constructed until plans and specifications have been approved by the department.

(2) A local government shall by resolution, ordinance, or regulation adopt and enforce minimum sanitary and safety requirements for the equipment and operation of swimming pools and bather preparation facilities which meet or exceed the minimum requirements adopted by the department pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

Laws 1969, c. 760, § 2, p. 2876;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 669;

Laws 2002, LB 1021, § 82;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 580;

R.S.1943, (2018), § 71-4302;

Laws 2021, LB148, § 5;

Laws 2026, LB759, § 27.
July 18, 2026